spellchecker/hunspell/bak/bash (1).aff
FLAG num
SFX 229 Y 1382 # V глагол
SFX 229 0 ол/217 [^пкҡ] +Pass
SFX 229 п бол/217 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Pass
SFX 229 0 ол/217 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Pass
SFX 229 к гол/217 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Pass
SFX 229 0 ол/217 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Pass
SFX 229 ҡ ғол/217 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Pass
SFX 229 0 ол/217 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Pass
SFX 229 0 ма/238 . +Neg
SFX 229 0 мағандар/115 . +Neg+Prc/ған+Pl
SFX 229 0 мағандың/117 . +Neg+Prc/ған+Gen
SFX 229 0 мағанға/121 . +Neg+Prc/ған+Dat
SFX 229 0 мағанғараҡ . +Neg+Prc/ған+Dat+Comp
SFX 229 0 мағанды/121 . +Neg+Prc/ған+Acc
SFX 229 0 мағандан/117,339 . +Neg+Prc/ған+Abl
SFX 229 0 мағанда/121,339 . +Neg+Prc/ған+Loc
SFX 229 0 мағандараҡ . +Neg+Prc/ған+Loc+Comp
SFX 229 0 мағанмын/126 . +Neg+Prc/ған+Pred1Sg
SFX 229 0 мағанһың/126 . +Neg+Prc/ған+Pred2Sg
SFX 229 0 мағанбыҙ/130 . +Neg+Prc/ған+Pred1Pl
SFX 229 0 мағанһығыҙ/130 . +Neg+Prc/ған+Pred2Pl
SFX 229 0 маған/195 . +Neg+Prc/ған
SFX 229 0 мағанмы . +Neg+Prc/ған+Q
SFX 229 0 мағанмылыр . +Neg+Prc/ған+Q+Indf
SFX 229 0 мағандыр . +Neg+Prc/ған+Indf
SFX 229 0 мағансы . +Neg+Prc/ған+Clt/сы
SFX 229 0 мағандыҡы/135,339 . +Neg+Prc/ған+Poss
SFX 229 0 мағанҡай/139 . +Neg+Prc/ған+Dim
SFX 229 0 мағандай/141 . +Neg+Prc/ған+Der/дай
SFX 229 0 мағанса/143 . +Neg+Prc/ған+Der/са
SFX 229 0 мағандағы/145 . +Neg+Prc/ған+Der/дағы
SFX 229 0 мағанлы/147 . +Neg+Prc/ған+Der/лы
SFX 229 0 мағанһыҙ/151 . +Neg+Prc/ған+Abe
SFX 229 0 мағанғаса/155 . +Neg+Prc/ған+Der/ҡаса
SFX 229 0 мағаныраҡ . +Neg+Prc/ған+Comp
SFX 229 0 маусылар/115 . +Neg+PrcPot+Pl
SFX 229 0 маусының/117 . +Neg+PrcPot+Gen
SFX 229 0 маусыға/121 . +Neg+PrcPot+Dat
SFX 229 0 маусығараҡ . +Neg+PrcPot+Dat+Comp
SFX 229 0 маусыны/121 . +Neg+PrcPot+Acc
SFX 229 0 маусынан/117,339 . +Neg+PrcPot+Abl
SFX 229 0 маусыла/121,339 . +Neg+PrcPot+Loc
SFX 229 0 маусылараҡ . +Neg+PrcPot+Loc+Comp
SFX 229 0 маусымын/126 . +Neg+PrcPot+Pred1Sg
SFX 229 0 маусыһың/126 . +Neg+PrcPot+Pred2Sg
SFX 229 0 маусыбыҙ/130 . +Neg+PrcPot+Pred1Pl
SFX 229 0 маусыһығыҙ/130 . +Neg+PrcPot+Pred2Pl
SFX 229 0 маусы/199 . +Neg+PrcPot
SFX 229 0 маусымы . +Neg+PrcPot+Q
SFX 229 0 маусымылыр . +Neg+PrcPot+Q+Indf
SFX 229 0 маусылыр . +Neg+PrcPot+Indf
SFX 229 0 маусысы . +Neg+PrcPot+Clt/сы
SFX 229 0 маусыныҡы/135,339 . +Neg+PrcPot+Poss
SFX 229 0 маусыҡай/139 . +Neg+PrcPot+Dim
SFX 229 0 маусылай/141 . +Neg+PrcPot+Der/дай
SFX 229 0 маусыса/143 . +Neg+PrcPot+Der/са
SFX 229 0 маусылағы/145 . +Neg+PrcPot+Der/дағы
SFX 229 0 маусылы/147 . +Neg+PrcPot+Der/лы
SFX 229 0 маусыһыҙ/151 . +Neg+PrcPot+Abe
SFX 229 0 маусығаса/155 . +Neg+PrcPot+Der/ҡаса
SFX 229 0 маусыраҡ . +Neg+PrcPot+Comp
SFX 229 0 мауҙар/115 . +Neg+Act+Pl
SFX 229 0 мауҙың/117 . +Neg+Act+Gen
SFX 229 0 мауға/121 . +Neg+Act+Dat
SFX 229 0 мауғараҡ . +Neg+Act+Dat+Comp
SFX 229 0 мауҙы/121 . +Neg+Act+Acc
SFX 229 0 мауҙан/117,339 . +Neg+Act+Abl
SFX 229 0 мауҙа/121,339 . +Neg+Act+Loc
SFX 229 0 мауҙараҡ . +Neg+Act+Loc+Comp
SFX 229 0 маумын/126 . +Neg+Act+Pred1Sg
SFX 229 0 мауһың/126 . +Neg+Act+Pred2Sg
SFX 229 0 маубыҙ/130 . +Neg+Act+Pred1Pl
SFX 229 0 мауһығыҙ/130 . +Neg+Act+Pred2Pl
SFX 229 0 мау/195 . +Neg+Act
SFX 229 0 маумы . +Neg+Act+Q
SFX 229 0 маумылыр . +Neg+Act+Q+Indf
SFX 229 0 мауҙыр . +Neg+Act+Indf
SFX 229 0 маусы . +Neg+Act+Clt/сы
SFX 229 0 мауҙыҡы/135,339 . +Neg+Act+Poss
SFX 229 0 мауҡай/139 . +Neg+Act+Dim
SFX 229 0 мауҙай/141 . +Neg+Act+Der/дай
SFX 229 0 мауса/143 . +Neg+Act+Der/са
SFX 229 0 мауҙағы/145 . +Neg+Act+Der/дағы
SFX 229 0 маулы/147 . +Neg+Act+Der/лы
SFX 229 0 мауһыҙ/151 . +Neg+Act+Abe
SFX 229 0 мауғаса/155 . +Neg+Act+Der/ҡаса
SFX 229 0 со . +Clt/сы
SFX 229 0 том/242,341 . +Indc+PxSg1
SFX 229 0 тоң/242,341 . +Indc+PxSg2
SFX 229 0 то/249,341 . +Indc+PxSg3
SFX 229 0 тоҡ/253,341 . +Indc+PxPl1
SFX 229 0 тоғоҙ/242,341 . +Indc+PxPl2
SFX 229 0 толар/244 . +Indc+PxPl3
SFX 229 0 ҡанмын/240 . +Past+PxSg1
SFX 229 0 ҡанһың/240 . +Past+PxSg2
SFX 229 0 ҡан/240,281 . +Past+PxSg3
SFX 229 0 ҡандар/115 . +Prc/ған+Pl
SFX 229 0 ҡандың/117 . +Prc/ған+Gen
SFX 229 0 ҡанға/121 . +Prc/ған+Dat
SFX 229 0 ҡанғараҡ . +Prc/ған+Dat+Comp
SFX 229 0 ҡанды/121 . +Prc/ған+Acc
SFX 229 0 ҡандан/117,339 . +Prc/ған+Abl
SFX 229 0 ҡанда/121,339 . +Prc/ған+Loc
SFX 229 0 ҡандараҡ . +Prc/ған+Loc+Comp
SFX 229 0 ҡанмын/126 . +Prc/ған+Pred1Sg
SFX 229 0 ҡанһың/126 . +Prc/ған+Pred2Sg
SFX 229 0 ҡанбыҙ/130 . +Prc/ған+Pred1Pl
SFX 229 0 ҡанһығыҙ/130 . +Prc/ған+Pred2Pl
SFX 229 0 ҡан/195 . +Prc/ған
SFX 229 0 ҡанмы . +Prc/ған+Q
SFX 229 0 ҡанмылыр . +Prc/ған+Q+Indf
SFX 229 0 ҡандыр . +Prc/ған+Indf
SFX 229 0 ҡансы . +Prc/ған+Clt/сы
SFX 229 0 ҡандыҡы/135,339 . +Prc/ған+Poss
SFX 229 0 ҡанҡай/139 . +Prc/ған+Dim
SFX 229 0 ҡандай/141 . +Prc/ған+Der/дай
SFX 229 0 ҡанса/143 . +Prc/ған+Der/са
SFX 229 0 ҡандағы/145 . +Prc/ған+Der/дағы
SFX 229 0 ҡанлы/147 . +Prc/ған+Der/лы
SFX 229 0 ҡанһыҙ/151 . +Prc/ған+Abe
SFX 229 0 ҡанғаса/155 . +Prc/ған+Der/ҡаса
SFX 229 0 ҡаныраҡ . +Prc/ған+Comp
SFX 229 0 ҡанбыҙ/240 . +Past+PxPl1
SFX 229 0 ҡанһығыҙ/240 . +Past+PxPl2
SFX 229 0 ҡандар/244 . +Past+PxPl3
SFX 229 0 ҡайным/240,339 . +Plu+PxSg1
SFX 229 0 ҡайның/240,339 . +Plu+PxSg2
SFX 229 0 ҡайны/247,339 . +Plu+PxSg3
SFX 229 0 ҡайныҡ/251,339 . +Plu+PxPl1
SFX 229 0 ҡайнығыҙ/240,339 . +Plu+PxPl2
SFX 229 0 ҡайнылар/244 . +Plu+PxPl3
SFX 229 0 ам/240 [^пкҡ] +Pres+PxSg1
SFX 229 п бам/240 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Pres+PxSg1
SFX 229 0 ам/240 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Pres+PxSg1
SFX 229 к гам/240 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Pres+PxSg1
SFX 229 0 ам/240 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Pres+PxSg1
SFX 229 ҡ ғам/240 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Pres+PxSg1
SFX 229 0 ам/240 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Pres+PxSg1
SFX 229 0 амын/240 [^пкҡ] +Pres+PxSg1
SFX 229 п бамын/240 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Pres+PxSg1
SFX 229 0 амын/240 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Pres+PxSg1
SFX 229 к гамын/240 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Pres+PxSg1
SFX 229 0 амын/240 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Pres+PxSg1
SFX 229 ҡ ғамын/240 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Pres+PxSg1
SFX 229 0 амын/240 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Pres+PxSg1
SFX 229 0 аһың/240 [^пкҡ] +Pres+PxSg2
SFX 229 п баһың/240 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Pres+PxSg2
SFX 229 0 аһың/240 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Pres+PxSg2
SFX 229 к гаһың/240 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Pres+PxSg2
SFX 229 0 аһың/240 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Pres+PxSg2
SFX 229 ҡ ғаһың/240 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Pres+PxSg2
SFX 229 0 аһың/240 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Pres+PxSg2
SFX 229 0 а/247 [^пкҡ] +Pres+PxSg3
SFX 229 п ба/247 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Pres+PxSg3
SFX 229 0 а/247 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Pres+PxSg3
SFX 229 к га/247 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Pres+PxSg3
SFX 229 0 а/247 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Pres+PxSg3
SFX 229 ҡ ға/247 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Pres+PxSg3
SFX 229 0 а/247 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Pres+PxSg3
SFX 229 0 араҡ [^пкҡ] +Prc/а+Comp
SFX 229 п бараҡ [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Prc/а+Comp
SFX 229 0 араҡ [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Prc/а+Comp
SFX 229 к гараҡ [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Prc/а+Comp
SFX 229 0 араҡ [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Prc/а+Comp
SFX 229 ҡ ғараҡ [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Prc/а+Comp
SFX 229 0 араҡ [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Prc/а+Comp
SFX 229 0 абыҙ/240 [^пкҡ] +Pres+PxPl1
SFX 229 п бабыҙ/240 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Pres+PxPl1
SFX 229 0 абыҙ/240 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Pres+PxPl1
SFX 229 к габыҙ/240 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Pres+PxPl1
SFX 229 0 абыҙ/240 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Pres+PxPl1
SFX 229 ҡ ғабыҙ/240 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Pres+PxPl1
SFX 229 0 абыҙ/240 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Pres+PxPl1
SFX 229 0 аһығыҙ/240 [^пкҡ] +Pres+PxPl2
SFX 229 п баһығыҙ/240 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Pres+PxPl2
SFX 229 0 аһығыҙ/240 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Pres+PxPl2
SFX 229 к гаһығыҙ/240 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Pres+PxPl2
SFX 229 0 аһығыҙ/240 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Pres+PxPl2
SFX 229 ҡ ғаһығыҙ/240 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Pres+PxPl2
SFX 229 0 аһығыҙ/240 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Pres+PxPl2
SFX 229 0 алар/244 [^пкҡ] +Pres+PxPl3
SFX 229 п балар/244 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Pres+PxPl3
SFX 229 0 алар/244 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Pres+PxPl3
SFX 229 к галар/244 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Pres+PxPl3
SFX 229 0 алар/244 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Pres+PxPl3
SFX 229 ҡ ғалар/244 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Pres+PxPl3
SFX 229 0 алар/244 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Pres+PxPl3
SFX 229 0 асаҡмын/240 [^пкҡ] +Fut2+PxSg1
SFX 229 п басаҡмын/240 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Fut2+PxSg1
SFX 229 0 асаҡмын/240 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Fut2+PxSg1
SFX 229 к гасаҡмын/240 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Fut2+PxSg1
SFX 229 0 асаҡмын/240 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Fut2+PxSg1
SFX 229 ҡ ғасаҡмын/240 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Fut2+PxSg1
SFX 229 0 асаҡмын/240 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Fut2+PxSg1
SFX 229 0 асаҡһың/240 [^пкҡ] +Fut2+PxSg2
SFX 229 п басаҡһың/240 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Fut2+PxSg2
SFX 229 0 асаҡһың/240 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Fut2+PxSg2
SFX 229 к гасаҡһың/240 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Fut2+PxSg2
SFX 229 0 асаҡһың/240 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Fut2+PxSg2
SFX 229 ҡ ғасаҡһың/240 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Fut2+PxSg2
SFX 229 0 асаҡһың/240 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Fut2+PxSg2
SFX 229 0 асаҡ/251 [^пкҡ] +Fut2+PxSg3
SFX 229 п басаҡ/251 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Fut2+PxSg3
SFX 229 0 асаҡ/251 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Fut2+PxSg3
SFX 229 к гасаҡ/251 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Fut2+PxSg3
SFX 229 0 асаҡ/251 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Fut2+PxSg3
SFX 229 ҡ ғасаҡ/251 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Fut2+PxSg3
SFX 229 0 асаҡ/251 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Fut2+PxSg3
SFX 229 0 асаҡтар/115 [^пкҡ] +Prc/асаҡ+Pl
SFX 229 п басаҡтар/115 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Prc/асаҡ+Pl
SFX 229 0 асаҡтар/115 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Prc/асаҡ+Pl
SFX 229 к гасаҡтар/115 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Prc/асаҡ+Pl
SFX 229 0 асаҡтар/115 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Prc/асаҡ+Pl
SFX 229 ҡ ғасаҡтар/115 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Prc/асаҡ+Pl
SFX 229 0 асаҡтар/115 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Prc/асаҡ+Pl
SFX 229 0 асаҡтың/117 [^пкҡ] +Prc/асаҡ+Gen
SFX 229 п басаҡтың/117 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Prc/асаҡ+Gen
SFX 229 0 асаҡтың/117 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Prc/асаҡ+Gen
SFX 229 к гасаҡтың/117 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Prc/асаҡ+Gen
SFX 229 0 асаҡтың/117 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Prc/асаҡ+Gen
SFX 229 ҡ ғасаҡтың/117 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Prc/асаҡ+Gen
SFX 229 0 асаҡтың/117 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Prc/асаҡ+Gen
SFX 229 0 асаҡҡа/121 [^пкҡ] +Prc/асаҡ+Dat
SFX 229 п басаҡҡа/121 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Prc/асаҡ+Dat
SFX 229 0 асаҡҡа/121 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Prc/асаҡ+Dat
SFX 229 к гасаҡҡа/121 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Prc/асаҡ+Dat
SFX 229 0 асаҡҡа/121 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Prc/асаҡ+Dat
SFX 229 ҡ ғасаҡҡа/121 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Prc/асаҡ+Dat
SFX 229 0 асаҡҡа/121 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Prc/асаҡ+Dat
SFX 229 0 асаҡҡараҡ [^пкҡ] +Prc/асаҡ+Dat+Comp
SFX 229 п басаҡҡараҡ [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Prc/асаҡ+Dat+Comp
SFX 229 0 асаҡҡараҡ [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Prc/асаҡ+Dat+Comp
SFX 229 к гасаҡҡараҡ [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Prc/асаҡ+Dat+Comp
SFX 229 0 асаҡҡараҡ [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Prc/асаҡ+Dat+Comp
SFX 229 ҡ ғасаҡҡараҡ [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Prc/асаҡ+Dat+Comp
SFX 229 0 асаҡҡараҡ [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Prc/асаҡ+Dat+Comp
SFX 229 0 асаҡты/121 [^пкҡ] +Prc/асаҡ+Acc
SFX 229 п басаҡты/121 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Prc/асаҡ+Acc
SFX 229 0 асаҡты/121 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Prc/асаҡ+Acc
SFX 229 к гасаҡты/121 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Prc/асаҡ+Acc
SFX 229 0 асаҡты/121 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Prc/асаҡ+Acc
SFX 229 ҡ ғасаҡты/121 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Prc/асаҡ+Acc
SFX 229 0 асаҡты/121 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Prc/асаҡ+Acc
SFX 229 0 асаҡтан/117,339 [^пкҡ] +Prc/асаҡ+Abl
SFX 229 п басаҡтан/117,339 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Prc/асаҡ+Abl
SFX 229 0 асаҡтан/117,339 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Prc/асаҡ+Abl
SFX 229 к гасаҡтан/117,339 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Prc/асаҡ+Abl
SFX 229 0 асаҡтан/117,339 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Prc/асаҡ+Abl
SFX 229 ҡ ғасаҡтан/117,339 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Prc/асаҡ+Abl
SFX 229 0 асаҡтан/117,339 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Prc/асаҡ+Abl
SFX 229 0 асаҡта/121,339 [^пкҡ] +Prc/асаҡ+Loc
SFX 229 п басаҡта/121,339 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Prc/асаҡ+Loc
SFX 229 0 асаҡта/121,339 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Prc/асаҡ+Loc
SFX 229 к гасаҡта/121,339 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Prc/асаҡ+Loc
SFX 229 0 асаҡта/121,339 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Prc/асаҡ+Loc
SFX 229 ҡ ғасаҡта/121,339 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Prc/асаҡ+Loc
SFX 229 0 асаҡта/121,339 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Prc/асаҡ+Loc
SFX 229 0 асаҡтараҡ [^пкҡ] +Prc/асаҡ+Loc+Comp
SFX 229 п басаҡтараҡ [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Prc/асаҡ+Loc+Comp
SFX 229 0 асаҡтараҡ [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Prc/асаҡ+Loc+Comp
SFX 229 к гасаҡтараҡ [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Prc/асаҡ+Loc+Comp
SFX 229 0 асаҡтараҡ [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]к +Prc/асаҡ+Loc+Comp
SFX 229 ҡ ғасаҡтараҡ [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Prc/асаҡ+Loc+Comp
SFX 229 0 асаҡтараҡ [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]ҡ +Prc/асаҡ+Loc+Comp
SFX 229 0 асаҡмын/126 [^пкҡ] +Prc/асаҡ+Pred1Sg
SFX 229 п басаҡмын/126 [аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Prc/асаҡ+Pred1Sg
SFX 229 0 асаҡмын/126 [^аәеёиоуыэюяөү]п +Prc/асаҡ+Pred1Sg
